Utah statutes.
58-1-306.   Surrender of license.

(1)  The division may, by written agreement, accept the voluntary surrender of a license.

(2)  Unless otherwise stated in the written agreement, tender and acceptance of a voluntary surrender of a license does not foreclose the division from pursuing additional disciplinary or other action authorized under this title or in rules adopted under this title.

(3)  Unless otherwise stated in the written agreement, tender and acceptance of a voluntary surrender of a license terminates all rights and privileges associated with the license.

(4)  Unless otherwise stated in the written agreement, the surrendered rights and privileges of licensure may be reacquired only by reapplying for licensure and meeting the requirements for a new or reinstated license set forth under this title or in rules adopted under this title.

(5)  Unless otherwise stated in the written agreement, documentation of tender and acceptance of a voluntary surrender of a license is a public record.

(6)  Unless otherwise stated in the written agreement, when a  tender and acceptance of a voluntary surrender of a license occurs while adjudicative proceedings are pending against the licensee for unprofessional or unlawful conduct, the division may report the surrender of license to appropriate state and federal agencies and licensing data banks.

